Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
CHAPTER 10 Georgia Board of Health Care Workforce

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1998, p. 616, effective July 1, 1998, repealed the Code sections formerly codified at this chapter and enacted the current chapter.
The former chapter consisted of Code Sections 49-10-1 through 49-10-6, relating to the Joint Board of Family Practice, and was based on Ga. L. 1976, p. 1096, §§ 1 - 6; Ga. L. 1978, p. 923, §§ 1 - 3; Ga. L. 1979, p. 642, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 571, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 49; Ga. L. 1984, p. 365, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1320, §§ 2 - 3.

Cross references.

Georgia Volunteers in Medicine Health Care Act, §

43-34-41

.

Administrative rules and regulations.

General internal medicine student preceptorships, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Board for Physician Workforce, Chapter 195-8.

Georgia Board for Physician Workforce, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Title 195.

49-10-1.
Board of Health Care Workforce; composition; expense allowances; staffing; advisory committees.

The Georgia Board for Physician Workforce which existed on January 1, 2019, is continued in existence but on and after July 1, 2019, shall become and be known as the Georgia Board of Health Care Workforce, referred to in this chapter as the “board,” and shall be attached to the Department of Community Health for administrative purposes only, as defined by Code Section 50-4-3, except that such department shall prepare and submit the budget for that board in concurrence with that board.

The board shall be composed of 15 members, all of whom are residents of this state, as follows:

Four members shall be primary care physicians, at least two of whom shall be from rural areas;

Four members shall be physicians who are not primary care physicians, at least two of whom shall practice in rural areas;

Three members shall be representatives of hospitals which are not teaching hospitals, with at least two of those three members being representatives of rural, nonprofit hospitals, and two of such members shall be physicians;

One member shall be a dentist;

One member shall be a physician assistant;

One member shall be a nurse practitioner; and

One member shall have no connection with the practice of medicine or the provision of health care.

The physicians on the board shall represent a diversity of medical disciplines, including, but not limited to, women’s health, geriatrics, and children’s health, and to the greatest extent possible, shall be in the active practice of medicine providing direct patient care. The board shall represent the gender, racial, and geographical diversity of the state.

All members of the board shall be appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the Senate. All members of the board in office on July 1, 2019, shall continue to serve as a member of the board until the expiration of his or her term of office. Successors to members shall be appointed for terms of six years. All members shall serve until their successors are appointed and qualified. Members appointed under this paragraph shall be eligible to serve on the board until confirmed by the Senate at the session of the General Assembly next following their appointment.

In case of a vacancy on the board by reason of death or resignation of a member or for any other cause other than the expiration of the member’s term of office, the board shall by secret ballot elect a temporary successor. If the General Assembly is in session, the temporary successor shall serve until the end of that session. If the General Assembly is not in session, the temporary successor shall serve until the end of the session next following the vacancy or until the expiration of the vacated member’s term of office, whichever occurs first. The Governor shall appoint a permanent successor who shall be confirmed by the Senate. The permanent successor shall take office on the first day after the General Assembly adjourns and shall serve for the unexpired term and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified.

The office on the board of a member thereof who fails to attend more than three consecutive regular meetings of the board, without excuse approved by resolution of the board, shall become vacant.

The board shall annually elect from its membership a chair, a vice chair, and a secretary-treasurer by ballot. Meetings shall be held at the call of the chair or upon written request of a majority of the members. A majority of members then in office shall constitute a quorum and shall have the authority to act upon any matter properly brought before the board. The board shall keep permanent minutes and records of all its proceedings and actions.

Each member of the board shall receive the same expense allowance per day as that received by a member of the General Assembly for each day or substantial portion thereof that such member of the board is engaged in the work of the board, in addition to such reimbursement for travel and other expenses as is normally allowed to state employees. No member of the board shall receive the above per diem for more than 30 days in any one calendar year.

The Department of Community Health, with the concurrence of the board, shall have the authority to employ such administrative staff as is necessary to carry out the functions of the board. Such staff members shall be employed within the limits of the appropriations made to the board.

The board, as it deems appropriate, shall have the authority to appoint advisory committees to advise the board on the fulfillment of its duties. The members of the advisory committees shall not receive any per diem or reimbursements; provided, however, that such members shall receive the mileage allowance provided for in Code Section 50-19-7 for the use of a personal car in connection with attendance at meetings called by the board.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-10-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 616, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 21; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1421, § 2; Ga. L. 2011, p. 459, § 6/HB 509; Ga. L. 2019, p. 224, § 1/SB 207.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011,
added “, at least three of whom shall be from rural areas” at the end of subparagraph (a)(2)(A); added “, at least three of whom shall practice in rural areas” at the end of subparagraph (a)(2)(B); and substituted “two of those three members being representatives of rural, nonprofit hospitals” for “one of those three members being a representative of a rural, nonprofit hospital” at the end of subparagraph (a)(2)(C).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, rewrote paragraphs (a)(1), (a)(2), and (a)(3), which read: “(a)(1) The Joint Board of Family Practice which existed on January 1, 1998, is continued in existence but on and after July 1, 1998, shall become and be known as the Georgia Board for Physician Workforce. The Georgia Board for Physician Workforce, referred to in this chapter as the ‘board,’ shall be attached to the Department of Community Health for administrative purposes only, as defined by Code Section 50-4-3, except that such department shall prepare and submit the budget for that board in concurrence with that board.

“(2) The Georgia Board for Physician Workforce shall be composed of 15 members, all of whom are residents of this state, as follows:

“(A) Five members shall be primary care physicians, at least three of whom shall be from rural areas;

“(B) Five members shall be physicians who are not primary care physicians, at least three of whom shall practice in rural areas;

“(C) Three members shall be representatives of hospitals which are not teaching hospitals, with at least two of those three members being representatives of rural, nonprofit hospitals;

“(D) One member shall be a representative from the business community;

“(E) One member shall have no connection with the practice of medicine or the provision of health care; and

“(F) The physicians on the board shall represent a diversity of medical disciplines, including, but not limited to, women’s health, geriatrics, and children’s health. The board shall represent the gender, racial, and geographical diversity of the state.

“(3) All members of the board shall be appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the Senate. The terms of office of all the members of the Joint Board of Family Practice shall expire July 1, 1998, but only at such time on or after that date when all 15 of the initial members of the Georgia Board of Physician Workforce have been appointed and qualified. No such initial member shall exercise any power under this chapter until all 15 members have been appointed and qualified. The initial members of the board who are appointed thereto shall take office for initial terms of office as follows:

“(A) Two primary care physicians, two physicians who are not primary care physicians, and one representative of a hospital which is not a teaching hospital shall be appointed to two-year terms of office;

“(B) Two primary care physicians, two physicians who are not primary care physicians, and one representative of a hospital which is not a teaching hospital shall be appointed to four-year terms of office; and

“(C) The remainder of the board shall be appointed to six-year terms of office.

“Thereafter, successors to such members shall be appointed for terms of six years. The Governor shall designate the term to which each initial member is appointed. All members shall serve until their successors are appointed and qualified. Members appointed under this paragraph shall be eligible to serve on the board until confirmed by the Senate at the session of the General Assembly next following their appointment.”

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1998, “vice chair” was substituted for “vice-chair” in the first sentence of subsection (b).

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, “Department of Community Health” was substituted for “Department of Community health” in subsection (d).

49-10-2.
Purpose.

The purpose of the board shall be to address the health care workforce needs of Georgia communities through the support and development of medical education programs and to increase the number of physicians and health care practitioners practicing in underserved rural areas.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-10-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 616, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 459, § 7/HB 509.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, substituted “health care” for “physician” near the beginning, and added “and to increase the number of physicians and health care practitioners practicing in underserved rural areas” at the end.

Cross references.

Reimbursement of expenses for state employees generally, § 45-7-20 et seq.

Law reviews.

For comment on Rogers v. Medical Ass’n,

244 Ga. 151

,

259 S.E.2d 85

(1979), as to unconstitutional delegation of legislative authority to a private organization, see 29 Emory L.J. 1183 (1980).

49-10-3.
Powers, duties, and responsibilities.

The board shall have the following powers, duties, and responsibilities:

To locate and determine specific underserved areas of the state in which unmet priority needs exist for physicians and health care practitioners by monitoring and evaluating the supply and distribution of physicians and health care practitioners by specialty and geographical location;

To award service cancelable loans and scholarships pursuant to Part 6 of Article 7 of Chapter 3 of Title 20, Chapter 34 of Title 31, or as otherwise provided by law;

To approve and allocate state appropriations for family practice training programs, including but not limited to fellowships in geriatrics and other areas of need as may be identified by the board;

To approve and allocate state appropriations for designated pediatric training programs;

To approve and allocate any other state funds appropriated to the Georgia Board of Health Care Workforce to carry out its purposes;

To coordinate and conduct with other state, federal, and private entities, as appropriate, activities to increase the number of graduating physicians and health care practitioners who remain in Georgia to practice with an emphasis on medically underserved areas of the state;

To apply for grants and to solicit and accept donations, gifts, and contributions from any source for the purposes of studying or engaging one or more contractors to study issues relevant to medical education or implementing initiatives designed to enhance the medical education infrastructure of this state and to meet the physician and other health care practitioners workforce needs of Georgia communities; and

To carry out any other functions assigned to the board by general law.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-10-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 616, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 77, § 1/HB 49; Ga. L. 2011, p. 459, § 7/HB 509; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 49/HB 942; Ga. L. 2019, p. 224, § 2/SB 207.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in paragraphs (1) and (6), inserted “and health care practitioners”; added paragraph (2); redesignated former paragraphs (2) through (7) as present paragraphs (3) through (8), respectively; and inserted “and other health care practitioners” near the end of paragraph (7).

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 1, 2012, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “To award service” for “Award service” at the beginning of paragraph (2).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “Georgia Board of Health Care Workforce” for “Georgia Board for Physician Workforce” in the middle of paragraph (5).

49-10-4.
Power to make contracts; authority to adopt rules and regulations.

The board shall have the power to contract with other state and federal agencies, persons, corporations, associations, institutions, and authorities in carrying out its responsibilities. In addition, the board shall have the authority to adopt reasonable rules and regulations to carry out those responsibilities.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-10-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 616, § 1.

49-10-5.
Behavioral Health Care Workforce Data Base; definitions; established; minimum data set.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Addictive disease” has the same meaning as in Code Section 37-1-1.

“Behavioral health care provider” means any health care provider regulated by a licensing board who primarily provides treatment or diagnosis of mental health or substance use disorders.

“Licensing board” means:

Georgia Composite Board of Professional Counselors, Social Workers, and Marriage and Family Therapists;

Georgia Board of Nursing;

Georgia Composite Medical Board;

State Board of Examiners of Psychologists; and

State Board of Pharmacy.

“Mental health or substance use disorder” means a mental illness or addictive disease.

“Mental illness” has the same meaning as in Code Section 37-1-1.

The board shall create and maintain the Behavioral Health Care Workforce Data Base for the purposes of collecting and analyzing minimum data set surveys for behavioral health care professionals. To facilitate such data base, the board shall:

Enter into agreements with entities to create, house, and provide information to the Governor, the General Assembly, state agencies, and the public regarding the state’s behavioral health care work force;

Seek federal or other sources of funding necessary to support the creation and maintenance of a Behavioral Health Care Workforce Data Base, including any necessary staffing;

Create and maintain an online dashboard accessible on the board’s website to provide access to the Behavioral Health Care Workforce Data Base; and

Establish a minimum data set survey to be utilized by licensing boards to collect demographic and other data from behavioral health care providers which are licensed by such boards.

Licensing boards shall be authorized to and shall require that each applicant and licensee complete the minimum data set survey established by the board pursuant to this Code section at the time of application for licensure or renewal of such applicant or licensee to his or her licensing board. Licensing boards shall provide the board with the results of such minimum data set surveys in accordance with rules and regulations established by the board regarding the manner, form, and content for the reporting of such data sets.

To the extent allowed by law, the minimum data set established by the board shall include, but shall not be limited to:

Demographics, including race, ethnicity, and primary and other languages spoken;

Practice status, including, but not limited to:

Active practices in Georgia and other locations;

Practice type and age range of individuals served; and

Practice settings, such as a hospital; clinic; school; in-home services, including telehealth services; or other clinical setting;

Education, training, and primary and secondary specialties;

Average hours worked per week and average number of weeks worked per year in the licensed profession;

Percentage of practice engaged in direct patient care and in other activities, such as teaching, research, and administration in the licensed profession;

Year of expected retirement, as applicable, within the next five years;

Whether the applicant or licensee has specialized training in treating children and adolescents, and if so, the proportion of his or her practice that comprises the treatment of children and adolescents;

Whether the applicant or licensee is or will be accepting new patients and the location or locations new patients are being or will be accepted;

Types of insurance accepted and whether the provider accepts Medicaid and Medicare; and

Other data determined by the board.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-10-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 26, § 2-2/HB 1013.

Effective date.

This Code section became effective July 1, 2022.

49-10-6.
[Repealed]

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 1998, p. 616, § 1, effective July 1, 1998.

Editor’s notes.

For information as to the repeal of this Code section, see the Editor’s notes at the beginning of the chapter.